New Jersey, session 221, A2985.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2013, c.19 (C.18A:46-54) is amended to read as follows: 1.    a.     The State Board of Education shall promulgate regulations to require school districts to develop a plan to establish stability in special education programming.  The plan shall take into account the consistency of the location, curriculum, and staffing in the provision of special education programs and services. b.    The State board regulations shall also require that when developing an individualized education program (IEP) with the parent or guardian of a student who is prone to regression due to frequent changes in location including, but not limited to, students diagnosed with autism spectrum disorder, the IEP team shall consider, among other factors, the consistency of the location of services when determining in-district special education placements. c.     The State board regulations shall also require that when developing an IEP with the parent or guardian of a student who is prone to regression including, but not limited to, students diagnosed with autism spectrum disorder, the IEP team shall consider, among other factors, the consistency of staffing when determining in-district special education placements. (cf: P.L.2013, c.19, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.